Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.141

Substitution of educational requirements—Rules.

The director may allow for substitution of the clock-hour requirements in RCW 18.85.101(1)(c) and 18.85.111(1)(d), if the director makes a determination that the individual is otherwise and similarly qualified by reason of completion of equivalent educational coursework in any institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or any degree-granting institution as defined in RCW 28B.85.010 approved by the director. The director shall establish, by rule, guidelines for determining equivalent educational coursework.

[ 2008 c 23 s 14; 1994 c 291 s 4; 1987 c 332 s 18. Formerly RCW 18.85.097.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 291: See note following RCW 18.85.101.